District of Columbia statutes.
4-1230.01

Repealed

No creation of an entitlement.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-221, § 31a
as added Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 102, 43 DCR 2978
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 7, 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-1030.1.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 7 of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
See notes to § 4-1201.